Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF5.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1167XS (3) 91 as/js S.F. 5 Section 1. Section 709.21, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 A person who knowingly views, photographs, or films another 3 person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual 4 desire of any person, or who possesses such photograph or film, 5 commits invasion of privacy if all of the following apply: 6